Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Finances and Claims

§ 15-2-201.
Fiscal year; appropriations; taxes; certification; expenditures; contracts and expenses; exception.

The fiscal year of each town begins July 1 in each year. Except as provided in W.S. 16-4-104(h), the governing body, within the last quarter of each fiscal year, shall pass an annual appropriation ordinance for the next fiscal year in which it may appropriate an amount of money necessary to defray all expenses and liabilities of the town. The ordinance shall specify the objects and purposes for which the appropriations are made and the amount appropriated for each object or purpose. No further appropriation may be made at any other time within the fiscal year, except as provided in W.S.

16-4-112

through

16-4-114

. The total amount appropriated shall not exceed the probable amount of revenue that will be collected during the fiscal year.

The governing body of each incorporated town, prior to adoption of the budget, shall determine the amount of general taxes necessary to provide for the current expenses of the town and determine the amount of any special tax or assessment levies.

After the governing body has passed an ordinance fixing the amount of taxes necessary as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the town clerk under the supervision of the mayor shall certify the amount of money to be collected to the county clerk.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

No contract or expenditure shall be made by the governing body or any committee or member thereof, or any of the officers of the town, unless an appropriation therefor has been previously made.

The provisions of this section do not apply to towns during the first year of their corporate existence.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 154 to 157; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-154 to 15.1-157; W.S. 1977, §§

15-2-201

to

15-2-204

; Laws 1977, ch. 45, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, §§ 2, 4; 2001, ch. 194, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to levy and collect taxes, assessments, etc., for general revenue and other purposes, see §

15-1-103

.

As to fiscal year of state, see §

9-4-101

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “begins July 1 in each year” for “begins May 1 in each year or at such other time fixed by ordinance” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Power to exceed appropriation limited. —

Where there were no dangerous conditions when a contract for street improvements was let, municipal authorities cannot exceed the annual appropriation. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

But sums spent in violation of section not recoverable. —

Where contract was let in violation of competitive bidding and expenditures were in excess of appropriation statute and the contract was held void, the town accepting and retaining the benefit of street improvements, under the circumstances, cannot recover back money paid under the void contract. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

City could not avoid contractual obligation by refusing toappropriate funds.

Summary judgment should not have been granted in favor of the city,
but instead should have been granted in favor of the union, because
the collective bargaining agreement was ambiguous, it was undisputed
that the five firefighters were eligible for step increases in pay,
the union presented evidence of past practices indicating that the
agreement should be interpreted to require step increases for all
eligible firefighters, and the city offered no evidence refuting that
of the union; moreover, there was no merit in the city's suggestion
that it could avoid a contractual obligation by refusing to appropriate
funds to pay that obligation.
Sheridan Fire Fighters Local No. 276 v. City of Sheridan, 2013 WY 36, 303 P.3d 1110,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2013).

Appellate review limited. —

Finding by trial court on conflicting evidence that no emergency existed authorizing town in exceeding its annual appropriation bill will not be disturbed by the supreme court, as the trial court's findings are binding. Tobin v. Town Council of Sundance, 45 Wyo. 219, 17 P.2d 666,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1933).

§ 15-2-202.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to presentation and payment of claims, see §

15-1-125

.

§ 15-2-203.
Treasurer's accounts; contents; report.

The treasurer of the town shall keep his accounts so as to show when and from what sources all monies paid to him have been derived and to whom and when the monies or any part thereof have been paid out. His books, accounts and vouchers are at all times subject to examination by the governing body or any elector of the town. It is the duty of the treasurer to provide the governing body with a financial report at such times, but not less than quarterly, and in a form as the governing body requires.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 159; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-159; W.S. 1977, § 15-2-206; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, § 2.

Notice of claim. —

Construction company seeking damages for breach of contract complied with the service requirements of Wyo. Const. art. 16, 7 when it served its notice of claim on the town's mayor, administrator, attorney, and project engineer. The construction company was not required to serve the notice of claim on the town treasurer under this section.
Excel Constr., Inc. v. Town of Lovell, 2011 WY 166, 268 P.3d 238,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2011).

Language of this section cannot be stretched to find even an obligation for a town treasurer to perform an auditing function, let alone to find an interpretation that makes a town treasurer the sole town official upon whom a governmental claim may be served. It imposes only obligations with respect to how a town's accounts must be maintained, their availability for inspection and a town treasurer's reporting frequency.
Excel Constr., Inc. v. Town of Lovell, 2011 WY 166, 268 P.3d 238,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 15-2-204.
Notice of receipts and expenditures; contents.

Immediately after the end of the fiscal year, the governing body shall publish in a newspaper, if one is published in the town, or if there is none then by posting in three (3) or more public places, an exhibit of the receipts and expenditures specifying:

The amount budgeted and actual receipts for all revenue sources;

The specific amount and purpose of each appropriation; and

The actual expenditures made against each appropriation.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 160; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-160; W.S. 1977, § 15-2-207; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, §§ 2, 4.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.